Tennessee, session 114, SB2145.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 36-3-627(a)(1), is amended by
adding the following new subdivision:
(D) A felony offense committed in another state that would constitute an offense
listed in this subdivision (a)(1) if committed in this state. If an offense in a jurisdiction
other than this state is not identified as one (1) of the offenses listed in this subdivision
(a)(1), then it must be considered an offense listed in this subdivision (a)(1) if the
elements of the offense are the same as the elements of the comparable offense in this
state.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 36-3-627(c), is amended by deleting
the subsection and substituting:
(c)
(1) Venue for a petition for an order of protection under subdivisions
(a)(1)(A)-(C), and all other matters relating to such an order of protection, is in
the county where the respondent resides, the county in which the offense
occurred, or, if the respondent is not a resident of this state, the county in which
the petitioner resides.
(2) Venue for a petition for an order of protection under subdivision
(a)(1)(D), and all other matters relating to such an order of protection, is in the
SB2145
011976
- 1 -

county where the respondent resides or, if the respondent is not a resident of this
state, the county in which the petitioner resides.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 011976